Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201445-191.10
Persons exempt.

The
following persons are exempt from sections 45-189 to 45-191.11 if such person
does not hold himself or herself out, through advertising, signs, or other
means, as a loan broker: Securities broker-dealer, real estate broker or salesperson,
attorney, certified public accountant,
or investment adviser.

Laws 1993, LB 270, § 12;

Laws 1995, LB 599, § 12;

Laws 2013, LB279, § 2.